Maine, session 132, LD625.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1730-A is enacted to read:
§1730-A. Maine Rural Health Care Education Workforce Fund
1. Fund established. The Maine Rural Health Care Education Workforce Fund,
referred to in this section as "the fund," is established to support rural primary care and
health professions workforce development as a dedicated, nonlapsing account within the
department.
2. Sources of fund. The fund consists of amounts appropriated or allocated by the
State.
3. Use of fund. The department shall make distributions from the fund to support the
following purposes:
A. Expanding rural longitudinal primary care clinical rotations for 3rd-year medical
students to support long-term professional practice in rural areas of the State;
B. Expanding rural primary care clinical rotations for 4th-year medical students to
support long-term professional practice in rural areas of the State;
C. Expanding rural primary care clinical residency placements in the State;
D. Supporting the long-term sustainability of rural clinical preceptorship programs to
provide support for students in undergraduate and graduate nursing programs; and
E. Supporting the expansion of rural primary care clinical rotations for physician
assistant students.
In distributing funds, the department shall prioritize health professional shortage areas or
medically underserved areas or populations identified by the federal Department of Health
and Human Services, Health Resources and Services Administration.
4. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Rural Health Care Education Workforce Fund N424
Initiative: Provides funding for the Maine Rural Health Care Education Workforce Fund.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500,000 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500,000 $500,000